tables/da-dk-g28.ctb
word problem 1234-12
begnum pb 56-1234-12
contraction pb
word problems 1234-12-234
begnum pbs 56-1234-12-234
contraction pb
word problemet 1234-12-346
word pbet =
word problemets 1234-12-346-234
word pbets =
word problemer 1234-12-156
word pber =
word problemers 1234-12-156-234
word pbers =
word problemerne 1234-12-156-1246
word pberne =
word problemernes 1234-12-156-1246-234
word pbernes =
word punktskrift 1234-1345-123456
word pnsk =
word på 1234

word ret 12356
word rigtige 1235-12456
word rge =
word rigtigt 1235-2345
begnum rt 56-1235-2345
contraction rt
word rigtig 1235

word sagde 234-1456
word sammen 234-134
begnum sm 56-234-134
contraction sm
word samme 234-146
word sme =
word samtidig 234-134-2345
begnum smt 56-234-134-2345
contraction smt
word selvfølgelig 234-1236-124
begnum svf 56-234-1236-124
contraction svf
word selv 234-1236
begnum sv 56-234-1236
contraction sv
word sidste 234-1356-15
word sste =
word sidst 234-1356
word sst =
word sin 234-1345
begnum sn 56-234-1345
contraction sn
word sit 234-2345
begnum st 56-234-2345
contraction st
word skal 123456
word skulle 123456-123-15
word skle =
word snart 234-1235
begnum sr 56-234-1235
contraction sr
word som 234
word spørgsmål 234-1234-134
begnum spm 56-234-1234-134
contraction spm
word spørgsmåls 234-1234-134-234
begnum spms 56-234-1234-134-234
contraction spms
word spørgsmålet 234-1234-134-346
word spmet =
word spørgsmålets 234-1234-134-346-234
word spmets =
word spørgsmålene 234-1234-134-1246
word spmne =
word spørgsmålenes 234-1234-134-1246-234
word spmnes =
word stadig 1356-1245
word stg =
word sådan 16-1
begnum åa 56-16-1
contraction åa
word således 16-15
begnum åe 56-16-15
contraction åe
word så 16

word tid 2345-145
begnum td 56-2345-145
contraction td
word tidlig 2345-145-123
begnum tdl 56-2345-145-123
contraction tdl
word tidlige 2345-145-123-12456
word tdlge =
word tidligere 2345-145-123-12356
word tdlre =
word tidligst 2345-145-123-1356
word tdlst =
word tilbage 2345-12
begnum tb 56-2345-12
contraction tb
word tilfælde 2345-124
begnum tf 56-2345-124
contraction tf
word til 2345

word under 12345

word vanskelig 1236-123456
word vsk =
word vanskelige 1236-123456-15
word vske =
word vanskeligt 1236-123456-2345
word vskt =
word var 3456
word ved 1236
word vidste 1236-1356-15
word vste =
word ville 1236-123-15
begnum vle 56-1236-123-15
contraction vle
word vil 1236-123
begnum vl 56-1236-123
contraction vl
word virkelig 1236-1235-13
begnum vrk 56-1236-1235-13
contraction vrk
word været 1236-2345
begnum vt 56-1236-2345
contraction vt
word være 345


word øjeblik 246-245-12
begnum øjb 56-246-245-12
contraction øjb

#Part words and words
begword dansk 145-123456
begword dsk =
nocross always den 12346
nocross always der 23456
nocross always det 2346
nocross always de 1456
nocross always en 126
nocross always er 156
nocross always et 346
nocross begword gang 1245-1245
begword gg 56-1245-1245
nocross begword gange 1245-1-1345-12456 # *** temporary patch
nocross partword ge 12456
begword hjælpe 125-1234-15
nocross partword hv 2456
nocross partword hvor 34
nocross partword ig 35
begword kvinde 13-1236-1456
begword kvde =
nocross partword me 146
begword menneske 146-123456-15
begword meske =
nocross partword nd 12345
nocross partword ne 1246
nocross partword or 1346
begword organisation 1346-1245-234
begword orgs =
begword problem 1234-12
begword pb 56-1234-12
nocross partword re 12356
nocross partword sk 123456
nocross partword st 1356
nocross always te 1256
begword virkelig 1236-1235-13
nocross partword ve 3456

nofor always www 2456-2456-2456 # does not work forward because of nocont

#special cases with dropped signs
# which can be both punctuations and contractions.

always fra! 124-1235-1-235
always !fra 235-124-1235-1
always !! 235-235
always !!! 235-235-235
always "fra" 2356-124-1235-1-2356
after punctuation always ! 56-235
always 'af 4-1-124

always \s! 0-56-235
prepunc ! 56-235
nofor always ! 56-235
noback context `["!"] @56-235


# Ensure no one-letter word contraction before or after a dash
prfword -af 36-1-124
sufword af- 1-124-36
prfword -at 36-1-2345
sufword at- 1-2345-36
prfword -deres 36-1456-12356-234
sufword deres- 1456-12356-234-36
prfword -du 36-145-136
sufword du- 145-136-36
prfword -efter 36-15-124-2345-156
sufword efter- 15-124-2345-156-36
prfword -for 36-124-1346
sufword for- 124-1346-36
prfword -fra 36-124-1235-1
sufword fra- 124-1235-1-36
prfword -gennem 36-1245-126-1246-134
sufword gennem- 1245-126-1246-134-36
prfword -ham 36-125-1-134
sufword ham- 125-1-134-36
prfword -han 36-125-1-1345
sufword han- 125-1-1345-36
prfword -har 36-125-1-1235
sufword har- 125-1-1235-36
prfword -hun 36-125-136-1345
sufword hun- 125-136-1345-36
prfword -kan 36-13-1-1345
sufword kan- 13-1-1345-36
prfword -lige 36-123-24-12456
sufword lige- 123-24-12456-36
prfword -med 36-146-145
sufword med- 146-145-36
prfword -men 36-134-126
sufword men- 134-126-36
prfword -ned 36-1246-145
sufword ned- 1246-145-36
prfword -når 36-1345-16-1235
sufword når- 1345-16-1235-36
prfword -og 36-135-1245
sufword og- 135-1245-36
prfword -op 36-135-1234
sufword op- 135-1234-36
prfword -over 36-135-1236-156
sufword over- 135-1236-156-36
prfword -på 36-1234-16
sufword på- 1234-16-36
prfword -ret 36-1235-346
sufword ret- 1235-346-36
prfword -rigtig 36-1235-35-2345-35
sufword rigtig- 1235-35-2345-35-36
prfword -skal 36-123456-1-123
sufword skal- 123456-1-123-36
prfword -som 36-234-135-134
sufword som- 234-135-134-36
prfword -så 36-234-16
sufword så- 234-16-36
prfword -til 36-2345-24-123
sufword til- 2345-24-123-36
prfword -under 36-136-1345-23456
sufword under- 136-1345-23456-36
prfword -ved 36-1236-15-145
sufword ved- 1236-15-145-36
prfword -være 36-1236-345-12356
sufword være- 1236-345-12356-36

# *** patches for various Liblouis bugs
# this file will be removed when the bugs are fixed

nofor always a 56-1
nofor always b 56-12
nofor always c 56-14
nofor always d 56-145
nofor always e 56-15
nofor always f 56-124
nofor always g 56-1245
nofor always h 56-125
nofor always j 56-245
nofor always k 56-13
nofor always l 56-123
nofor always m 56-134
nofor always n 56-1345
nofor always o 56-135
nofor always p 56-1234
nofor always q 56-12345
nofor always r 56-1235
nofor always s 56-234
nofor always t 56-2345
nofor always u 56-136
nofor always v 56-1236
nofor always w 56-2456
nofor always x 56-1346
nofor always y 56-13456
nofor always z 56-1356
nofor always æ 56-345
nofor always ø 56-246
nofor always å 56-16

nofor always A 56-17
nofor always B 56-127
nofor always C 56-147
nofor always D 56-1457
nofor always E 56-157
nofor always F 56-1247
nofor always G 56-12457
nofor always H 56-1257
nofor always J 56-2457
nofor always K 56-137
nofor always L 56-1237
nofor always M 56-1347
nofor always N 56-13457
nofor always O 56-1357
nofor always P 56-12347
nofor always Q 56-123457
nofor always R 56-12357
nofor always S 56-2347
nofor always T 56-23457
nofor always U 56-1367
nofor always V 56-12367
nofor always W 56-24567
nofor always X 56-13467
nofor always Y 56-134567
nofor always Z 56-13567
nofor always Æ 56-3457
nofor always Ø 56-2467
nofor always Å 56-167

# if a word contraction is followed by a punctuation and another word immediately after,
# The contracted word before the punctuation will back-translate as its components
attribute wordlimit /,!.:’()?"'\x00ab_\x201d\x0094\x2019\x0092\x00bb
nofor before wordlimit begword af 356
nofor before wordlimit begword aldrig 1-35
nofor before wordlimit begword alle 1-15
nofor before wordlimit begword allerede 1-123-1235
nofor before wordlimit begword alligevel 1-123-1236
nofor before wordlimit begword altid 1-2345-145
nofor before wordlimit begword altså 1-16
nofor before wordlimit begword arbejde 1-12-1456
nofor before wordlimit begword arbejdede 1-12-1456-1456
nofor before wordlimit begword arbejder 1-12-23456
nofor before wordlimit begword arbejdet 1-12-2346
nofor before wordlimit begword at 1

nofor before wordlimit begword betyde 12-2345-1456
nofor before wordlimit begword betyder 12-2345-23456
nofor before wordlimit begword blevet 12-2345
nofor before wordlimit begword blev 12-1236
nofor before wordlimit begword blive 12-3456
nofor before wordlimit begword bve 12-1236-15
nofor before wordlimit begword bliver 12

nofor before wordlimit begword danmark 145-1345-13
nofor before wordlimit begword danmarks 145-1345-13-234
nofor before wordlimit begword dansk 145-123456
nofor before wordlimit begword derefter 23456-1356
nofor before wordlimit begword derst =
nofor before wordlimit begword deres 256
nofor before wordlimit begword derfor 23456-124
nofor before wordlimit begword derf =
nofor before wordlimit begword derigennem 23456-24-12456
nofor before wordlimit begword derige 1456-1235-24-12456
nofor before wordlimit begword dermed 23456-134
nofor before wordlimit begword derm =
nofor before wordlimit begword derned 23456-1246
nofor before wordlimit begword derne =
nofor before wordlimit begword derop 23456-135
nofor before wordlimit begword dero =
nofor before wordlimit begword derover 23456-1346
nofor before wordlimit begword deror =
nofor before wordlimit begword derpå 23456-1234
nofor before wordlimit begword derp =
nofor before wordlimit begword dersom 23456-234
nofor before wordlimit begword ders =
nofor before wordlimit begword dertil 23456-2345
nofor before wordlimit begword dert =
nofor before wordlimit begword derunder 23456-12345
nofor before wordlimit begword derved 23456-1236
nofor before wordlimit begword din 145-1345
nofor before wordlimit begword disse 145-234
nofor before wordlimit begword dit 145-2345
nofor before wordlimit begword du 145

nofor before wordlimit begword efter 1356
nofor before wordlimit begword eftersom 1356-234
nofor before wordlimit begword eller 15
nofor before wordlimit begword endnu 15-136

nofor before wordlimit begword faktisk 124-13-2345
nofor before wordlimit begword fik 124-13
nofor before wordlimit begword forbi 124-12
nofor before wordlimit begword fordi 124-145
nofor before wordlimit begword forskellige 124-123456-15
nofor before wordlimit begword fske =
nofor before wordlimit begword forskelligt 124-123456-2345
nofor before wordlimit begword fskt =
nofor before wordlimit begword forskellig 124-123456
nofor before wordlimit begword fsk =
nofor before wordlimit begword for 124
nofor before wordlimit begword fortælle 124-1256
nofor before wordlimit begword fortæller 124-2345-156
nofor before wordlimit begword fra 235
nofor before wordlimit begword første 124-1356-15
nofor before wordlimit begword først 124-1356
nofor before wordlimit begword før 246

nofor before wordlimit begword gang 1245-1245
nofor before wordlimit begword gange 1245-12456
nofor before wordlimit begword ganske 1245-123456
nofor before wordlimit begword gennem 12456
nofor before wordlimit begword ge =
nofor before wordlimit begword gik 1245-13
nofor before wordlimit begword gør 1245
